Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2889.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; department of environmental quality; uranium contamination; monitoring program; report; exemption A. The sum of $50,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of environmental quality to monitor uranium contamination. The department of environmental quality shall use the monies to fund soil, water and home testing for potential uranium contamination. B. The department of environmental quality shall establish a statewide registry and monitoring program for potential uranium contamination in this state. The department of environmental quality shall partner with tribal epidemiology centers to implement the registry and monitoring program. C. On or before December 31, 2027, the department of environmental quality shall submit a report of findings and recommendations to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. D. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.